Hawaii statutes.
PART III.
WATER DEVELOPMENT

§183-31 Watershed areas. The
department of land and natural resources shall determine, after public hearing
held in the same manner as provided in section 91-3, areas which are
watersheds.

The term "watershed" as used in this
part means (1) an area from which the domestic water supply of any city, town
or community is or may be obtained, or (2) an area where water infiltrates into
artesian or other ground-water areas from which the domestic water supply of
any city, town or community is or may be obtained. [L 1949, c 274, §2; RL 1955,
§19-21; am L 1965, c 96, §15; HRS §183-31]

Cross References

Other water
development provisions, see chapter 174.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next